Hawaii statutes.
§346-240 Adjudicatory hearing. (a)
When a petition has been filed, the court shall set a return date hearing to be
held within thirty days of the filing of the petition. On the return date, the
parties personally or through counsel may stipulate to the entry or continuance
of the orders as the court deems to be in the best interests of the vulnerable
adult, and the court shall set the case for an adjudicatory hearing as soon as
is practical.

(b) In an adjudicatory hearing, the court
shall determine whether the person is a vulnerable adult, and whether the
vulnerable adult has incurred abuse or is in danger of abuse if immediate
action is not taken, based upon a preponderance of the evidence. Evidence that
is contained in a written report, study, or examination shall be admissible;
provided that the maker of the written report, study, or examination be subject
to direct and cross-examination upon demand when the maker is reasonably
available. A social worker employed by the department in the area of adult
protective services shall be presumed to be qualified to testify as an expert
in the field of protective services.

(c) If facts sufficient to sustain the
petition are established in court, or are stipulated to by all parties, the
court shall enter an order finding that the vulnerable adult has incurred abuse
or is in danger of abuse if immediate action is not taken and shall state the
grounds for the finding. The court shall also make a finding concerning the
capacity of the vulnerable adult to effectively make decisions concerning
personal needs or property. If the capacity of the vulnerable adult is at
issue, the court shall require that the vulnerable adult be examined by a
psychiatrist or other physician who is skilled in evaluating the particular
area in which the vulnerable adult is alleged to lack capacity before making
any finding that the vulnerable adult lacks capacity. If there is no finding
that the vulnerable adult lacks capacity to make decisions regarding personal
needs or property and if the vulnerable adult does not give consent, the court
shall not have authority to proceed further and the court shall dismiss the
case.

(d) Upon the completion of the adjudicatory
hearing, the disposition hearing may commence immediately after the required
findings are made, provided the requirements of section 346-241(a) have been
met, or the court may set the disposition hearing for such time as it deems
appropriate.

(e) If facts sufficient to sustain the
petition under this part are not established, the court shall dismiss the
petition and shall state the grounds for dismissal.

(f) If the court sustains the petition and
does not commence immediately to the disposition hearing, it shall determine,
based upon the facts adduced during the adjudicatory hearing and any additional
facts presented to it, whether any temporary orders should be issued pending
final disposition. [L 1989, c 381, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 144, §1 and c 234,
§9; am L 2008, c 154, §21]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next